Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1301.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4(l)(4) of the act of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law, is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:Section 4. Definitions.--The following words and phrases, as used in this act, shall have the following meanings, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.* * *12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 (l) * * *(4) The word "employment" shall not include--* * *(22) Services performed by an alien who is admitted to the United States to perform temporary, seasonal labor pursuant to 8 U.S.C. §§ 1101(a)(15)(H)(i)(b) (relating to definitions) and 1184(c) (relating to admission of nonimmigrants) of the Immigration and Nationality Act.* * *Section 2. This act shall apply to services performed on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1301PN1639 - 2 - 123456789101112